Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,107.04
Equity securities insider trading; failure to file report; penalty.

Any domestic insurer which fails to comply with section 44-3,107 and any person who fails to comply with section 44-3,107.03 shall forfeit to the State of Nebraska the sum of one hundred dollars for each and every day such failure to comply shall continue. Such forfeiture, which shall be in lieu of any criminal penalty for such failure to comply which might be deemed to arise under sections 44-3,107 to 44-3,107.04 and 44-3,111 to 44-3,114, shall be payable into the treasury of the State of Nebraska and shall be recoverable in a civil suit in the name of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1969, c. 368, § 5, p. 1308.